Tennessee, session 114, HB1824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A safety rest area, as defined in § 54-21-102, that provides restrooms for the
public, must provide access to no less than one (1) family restroom, as defined in § 4-3-
2316(a).
(b) It is the legislative intent that the department of transportation pay for the
construction and maintenance of the restrooms from the department's existing
resources.
SECTION 2. On or before July 1, 2026, the department of transportation shall provide to
the transportation and safety committee of the senate and the committee in the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over transportation-related matters a detailed construction
schedule for completion of each family restroom described in Section 1 and the date by which
all safety rest areas will be in compliance with Section 1.
SECTION 3. On or before July 1, 2028, the department of transportation shall complete
the construction of, or have begun the construction of, at least one (1) family restroom as
described in Section 1 at a safety rest stop.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1824
011366
- 1 -